Illinois, session 104th, SB3210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 5-810 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-810)7    Sec. 5-810. Extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecutions. 8    (1)(a) The If the State's Attorney may file files a 9written petition, at any time prior to commencement of the 10minor's trial, to designate the proceeding as an extended 11jurisdiction juvenile prosecution when and the petition 12alleges the commission by a minor 15 13 years of age or older 13of any offense which would be a felony if committed by an 14adult, and, if the juvenile judge assigned to hear and 15determine petitions to designate the proceeding as an extended 16jurisdiction juvenile prosecution determines that there is 17probable cause to believe that the allegations in the petition 18and motion are true, there is a rebuttable presumption that 19the proceeding shall be designated as an extended jurisdiction 20juvenile proceeding.21    (b) Upon filing of a petition, the The judge shall conduct 22a hearing at which he or she shall first determine whether 23there is probable cause to believe that the allegations in the   SB3210- 2 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1petition and motion are true. If probable cause is found, the 2judge may enter an order designating the proceeding as an 3extended jurisdiction juvenile proceeding if unless the judge 4makes a finding based on clear and convincing evidence that 5sentencing under Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections 6may would not be appropriate for the minor based on an 7evaluation of the following factors:8        (i) the minor's age, impetuosity, and level of 9    maturity at the time of the offense, including the ability 10    to consider risks and consequences of behavior, and any 11    presence of cognitive or developmental disability, or 12    both, including if a comprehensive mental health 13    evaluation of the minor was conducted by a qualified 14    mental health professional, the outcome of the evaluation 15    age of the minor; 16        (ii) the history of the minor, including: 17            (A) any previous delinquent or criminal history of 18        the minor; , 19            (B) the minor's family, home environment, 20        educational and social background, including any 21        history of parental neglect, domestic or sexual 22        violence, sexual exploitation, physical abuse, or 23        other childhood trauma including adverse childhood 24        experiences; any previous abuse or neglect history of 25        the minor, 26            (C) any mental health, physical and/or educational   SB3210- 3 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1        history of the minor, and2            (D) any involvement of the minor in the child 3        welfare system;4        (iii) the circumstances of the offense, including: 5            (A) the seriousness of the offense; , 6            (B) (blank); whether the minor is charged through 7        accountability, 8            (C) (blank); whether there is evidence the offense 9        was committed in an aggressive and premeditated 10        manner, 11            (D) (blank); whether there is evidence the offense 12        caused serious bodily harm, 13            (E) (blank); whether there is evidence the minor 14        possessed a deadly weapon, 15            (F) whether there is evidence the minor was 16        subjected to outside pressure, including peer 17        pressure, familial pressure, or negative influences; , 18        and19            (G) the minor's degree of participation and 20        specific role in the offense, including the level of 21        planning by the minor before the offense and whether 22        the minor is charged through accountability; 23        (iv) the advantages of treatment within the juvenile 24    justice system including whether there are facilities or 25    programs, or both, particularly available in the juvenile 26    system, and the minor's potential for rehabilitation or   SB3210- 4 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1    evidence of rehabilitation, or both. ; 2        (v) whether the security of the public requires 3    sentencing under Chapter V of the Unified Code of 4    Corrections:5            (A) the minor's history of services, including the 6        minor's willingness to participate meaningfully in 7        available services;8            (B) whether there is a reasonable likelihood that 9        the minor can be rehabilitated before the expiration 10        of the juvenile court's jurisdiction;11            (C) the adequacy of the punishment or services.12    The trial court shall specify on the record its 13consideration of these factors In considering these factors, 14the court shall give greater weight to the seriousness of the 15alleged offense, and the minor's prior record of delinquency 16than to other factors listed in this subsection.17    (2) Procedures for extended jurisdiction juvenile 18prosecutions. The State's Attorney may file a written motion 19for a proceeding to be designated as an extended juvenile 20jurisdiction prior to commencement of trial. Notice of the 21motion shall be in compliance with Section 5-530. When the 22State's Attorney files a written motion that a proceeding be 23designated an extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution, the 24court shall commence a hearing within 30 days of the filing of 25the motion for designation, unless good cause is shown by the 26prosecution or the minor as to why the hearing could not be   SB3210- 5 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1held within this time period. If the court finds good cause has 2been demonstrated, then the hearing shall be held within 60 3days of the filing of the motion. The minor may waive these 4timelines The hearings shall be open to the public unless the 5judge finds that the hearing should be closed for the 6protection of any party, victim or witness. If the Juvenile 7Judge assigned to hear and determine a motion to designate an 8extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution determines that 9there is probable cause to believe that the allegations in the 10petition and motion are true the court shall grant the motion 11for designation. Information used by the court in its findings 12or stated in or offered in connection with this Section may be 13by way of proffer based on reliable information offered by the 14State or the minor. All evidence shall be admissible if it is 15relevant and reliable regardless of whether it would be 16admissible under the rules of evidence. 17    (3) Trial. A minor who is the subject of an extended 18jurisdiction juvenile prosecution has the right to trial by 19jury. Any trial under this Section shall be open to the public.20    (4) Sentencing. If an extended jurisdiction juvenile 21prosecution under subsection (1) results in a guilty plea, a 22verdict of guilty, or a finding of guilt, the court may shall 23impose the following:24        (i) one or more juvenile sentences under Section 25    5-710; or and26        (ii) one or more juvenile sentences under Section   SB3210- 6 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1    5-710 and an adult criminal sentence in accordance with 2    the provisions of Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of 3    Corrections, the execution of which shall be stayed on the 4    condition that the offender not violate the provisions of 5    the juvenile sentence.6Any sentencing hearing under this Section shall be open to the 7public.8    (5) If, after an extended jurisdiction juvenile 9prosecution trial, a minor is convicted of a lesser-included 10offense or of an offense that the State's Attorney did not 11designate as an extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution, 12the State's Attorney may file a written motion, within 10 days 13of the finding of guilt, that the minor be sentenced subject to 14as an extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution offender. The 15court shall rule on this motion using the factors found in 16paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and the procedures in 17subsection (2) paragraph (1)(b) of Section 5-805. If the court 18denies the State's Attorney's motion for sentencing under the 19extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution provision, the 20court shall proceed to sentence the minor under Section 5-710.21    (6) When it appears that a minor adjudicated delinquent 22convicted in an extended jurisdiction juvenile prosecution 23under subsection (1) has violated the conditions of the 24minor's sentence, or is alleged to have committed a new 25offense that would be a forcible felony if committed by an 26adult, and an adult sentence was imposed under paragraph (ii)   SB3210- 7 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1of subsection (4), the State's Attorney may file a petition to 2revoke the stay. The State's Attorney must notify the minor, 3minor's counsel, and the minor's parents or guardians of the 4upon the filing of a petition to revoke the stay, after which 5the court may, without notice, issue a warrant for the arrest 6of the minor. After a hearing, if the court finds beyond a 7reasonable doubt by a preponderance of the evidence that the 8minor committed a new offense that would be a forcible felony 9if committed by an adult, the court may shall order execution 10of the previously imposed adult criminal sentence. After a 11hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence 12that the minor committed a violation of the minor's sentence 13other than by a new offense, the court may order execution of 14the previously imposed adult criminal sentence or may continue 15the minor on the existing juvenile sentence with or without 16modifying or enlarging the conditions. Upon revocation of the 17stay of the adult criminal sentence and imposition of that 18sentence, the minor's extended jurisdiction juvenile status 19shall be terminated. The on-going jurisdiction over the 20minor's case shall be assumed by the adult criminal court and 21juvenile court jurisdiction shall be terminated and a report 22of the imposition of the adult sentence shall be sent to the 23Illinois State Police.24    (7) Upon successful completion of the juvenile sentence 25the court shall vacate the adult criminal sentence.26    (8) Nothing in this Section precludes the State from   SB3210- 8 -LRB104 19678 RLC 33127 b1filing a motion for transfer under Section 5-805.2(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-191, eff. 1-1-24; 3103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)